Ohio, session 136, HB744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 503.40, 503.41, 503.42, 503.44, 503.45, 503.46, 503.47, 503.48, 503.49, 2927.17, 4731.04, 4731.15, 4731.41, and 4731.99 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 503.40. As used in sections 503.40 to 503.49 of the Revised Code: (A) "Massage therapy" means any method of exerting pressure on, stroking, kneading, rubbing, tapping, pounding, vibrating, or stimulating the external soft tissue of the body with the hands, or with the aid of any mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliance has the same meaning as in section 4731.04 of the Revised Code. (B) "Massage establishment" means any fixed place of business where a person offers massagesmassage therapy is provided: (1) In exchange for anything of value; or (2) In connection with the provision of another legitimate service. (C) "Masseur" or "masseuse""Massager" means any individual who has obtained a license from a board of township trustees as provided in section 503.45 and who performs massages massage therapy at a massage establishment. (D) "Sexual or genital area" includes the genitalia, pubic area, anus, perineum of any person, and the breasts of a female. Sec. 503.41. (A) A board of township trustees, by resolution, may regulate and require the registration of massage establishments and their employees within the unincorporated territory of the township. In accordance with sections 503.40 to 503.49 of the Revised Code, for that purpose, the board, by a majority vote of all members, may adopt, amend, administer, and enforce regulations within the unincorporated territory of the township. (B) A board may adopt regulations and amendments under this section only after public hearing at not fewer than two regular sessions of the board. The board shall publish notice of the public hearings, including the time, date, and place, once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the hearings using at least one of the following methods: (1) In the print or digital edition of a newspaper of general circulation in the township; (2) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (3) On the web site and social media account of the township. The board shall make available proposed regulations or amendments to the public at the office of the board. (C) Regulations or amendments adopted by the board are effective thirty days after the date of adoption unless, within thirty days after the adoption of the regulations or amendments, the township fiscal officer receives a petition, signed by a number of qualified electors residing in the unincorporated area of the township equal to not less than ten per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in the area at the most recent general election at which a governor was elected, requesting the board to submit the regulations or amendments to the electors of the area for approval or rejection at the next primary or general election occurring at least ninety days after the board receives the petition. No regulation or amendment for which the referendum vote has been requested is effective unless a majority of the votes cast on the issue is in favor of the regulation or amendment. Upon certification by the board of elections that a majority of the votes cast on the issue was in favor of the regulation or amendment, the regulation or amendment takes immediate effect. (D) The board shall make available regulations it adopts or amends to the public at the office of the board and shall cause to be published once a notice of the availability of the regulations within ten days after their adoption or amendment, using at least one of the following methods: (1) In the print or digital edition of a newspaper of general circulation in the township; (2) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (3) On the web site and social media account of the township. (E) Nothing in sections 503.40 to 503.49 of the Revised Code shall be construed to allow a board of township trustees toregulate to regulate the practice of any limited branch of medicine specified in section 4731.15 of the Revised Code or the practice of providing therapeutic massage therapy by a licensed physician, a licensed chiropractor, a licensed podiatrist, a licensed nurse, or any other licensed health professionalperson who meets the conditions specified in division (F) of that section. As used in this division, "licensed" means licensed, certified, or registered to practice in this state. (F) If a township adopts regulations to require the registration of massage establishments and their employees, the township shall comply with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code. Sec. 503.42. If a board of township trustees has adopted a resolution under section 503.41 of the Revised Code: (A) No person shall engage in, conduct or carry on, or permit to be engaged in, conducted or carried on in the unincorporated areas of the township, the operation of a massage establishment without first having obtained a permit from the board of township trustees as provided in section 503.43 of the Revised Code. (B) No individual shall act as a masseur or masseuse massager for a massage establishment located in the unincorporated areas of the township without first having obtained a license from the board of township trustees as provided in section 503.45 of the Revised Code. (C) No owner or operator of a massage establishment located in the unincorporated areas of the township shall knowingly do any of the following: (1) Employ an unlicensed masseur or masseusemassager; (2) Refuse to allow appropriate state or local authorities, including police officers, access to the massage establishment for any health or safety inspection conducted pursuant to a regulation adopted by the township under section 503.41 of the Revised Code; (3) Operate during the hours designated as prohibited hours of operation by the board of township trustees; (4) Employ any person under the age of eighteen. (D) No person employed in a massage establishment located in the unincorporated area of the township shall knowingly do any of the following in the performance of duties at the massage establishment: (1) Place his or her hand upon, touch with any part of his or her body, fondle in any manner, or massage the sexual or genital area of any other person; (2) Perform, offer, or agree to perform any act which would require the touching of the sexual or genital area of any other person; (3) Touch, offer, or agree to touch the sexual or genital area of any other person with any mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliance; (4) Wear unclean clothing, no clothing, transparent clothing, or clothing that otherwise reveals the sexual or genital areas of the masseur or masseusemassager; (5) Uncover or allow the sexual or genital area of any other person to be uncovered while providing massagesmassage therapy. (E) No licensed masseur or masseuse massager shall accept or continue employment at a massage establishment that does not have a current, valid permit issued by the board of township trustees. Sec. 503.44. If a board of township trustees has adopted a resolution under section 503.41 of the Revised Code, it shall deny any application for a permit to operate a massage establishment or revoke a previously issued permit, for any of the following reasons: (A) Falsification of any of the information required for the application or failure to fully complete the application; (B) Failure to cooperate with any required health or safety inspection; (C) Any one of the persons named on the application is under the age of eighteen; (D) Any one of the persons named on the application has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any violation of Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code, or any violation of any municipal ordinance that is substantially equivalent to any offense contained in Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code, within five years preceding the application; (E) Any masseur or masseusemassager employed at the licensed massage establishment has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (D) of section 503.42 of the Revised Code. Sec. 503.45. If a board of township trustees has adopted a resolution under section 503.41 of the Revised Code, the application for a license as a massager shall be made to the board and shall include the following: (A) An initial, nonrefundable filing fee of one hundred dollars and an annual nonrefundable renewal fee of fifty dollars; (B) The results of a physical examination performed by a licensed physician, a physician assistant, a clinical nurse specialist, a certified nurse practitioner, or a certified nurse-midwife within thirty days of the application certifying that the applicant is free from communicable diseases; (C) The full name, date of birth, address, and social security number of the applicant; (D) Evidence that the applicant holds a current, valid license to practice massage therapy issued by the state medical board under section 4731.15 of the Revised Code; (E) The results of an investigation by appropriate police agencies into the criminal record of the applicant, including a photograph taken no later than thirty days prior to the application, fingerprints, and background investigation; (E)(F) Any other information determined by the board to be necessary. A license issued under this section to a massager shall expire one year after the date of issuance, except that no massager shall be required to discontinue performing massages massage therapy because of the failure of the board to act on a renewal application filed in a timely manner and pending before the board on the expiration date of the person's license. Each license shall contain the full name of the applicant, a color photograph and a brief description of the person, and the expiration date of the license. Sec. 503.46. If a board of township trustees has adopted a resolution under section 503.41 of the Revised Code, it shall deny the application for a masseur or masseuse license licensure as a massager or revoke a previously issued license for any of the following reasons: (A) Falsification of any of the information required for the application or failure to fully complete the application; (B) Failure to maintain a current, valid license to practice massage therapy issued by the state medical board under section 4731.15 of the Revised Code; (C) The applicant is under the age of twenty-one. (C)(D) The applicant has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any violation of Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code, or violation of any municipal ordinance that is substantially equivalent to any offense contained in Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code, within five years preceding the application. (D)(E) The applicant has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (D) of section 503.42 of the Revised Code. Sec. 503.47. If a board of township trustees has adopted a resolution under section 503.41 of the Revised Code, the regulations adopted for that purpose may require any of the following: (A) A massage establishment to display its current permit in an area open to the public; (B) Each massager to display the massager's license at all times in the areas where the licensee is providing massagesmassage therapy; (C) Massage establishments to undergo periodic health and safety inspections to determine continual compliance with applicable health and safety codes; (D) Massagers to undergo periodic physical examinations performed by a licensed physician, a physician assistant, a clinical nurse specialist, a certified nurse practitioner, or a certified nurse-midwife certifying that the massager continues to be free from communicable diseases; (E) Any other requirement reasonably thought necessary by the board. Sec. 503.48. A board of township trustees acting under sections 503.40 to 503.49 of the Revised Code need not hold any hearing in connection with an order denying or revoking a permit to operate a massage establishment or masseur or masseusemassager license. The board shall maintain a complete record of each proceeding and shall notify the applicant in writing of its order. Any person adversely affected by an order of the board denying or revoking a permit to operate a massage establishment or masseur or masseusemassager license may appeal from the order of the board to the court of common pleas of the county in which the township is located, the place of business of the permit holder is located, or the person is a resident. The appeal shall be in accordance with Chapter 2506. of the Revised Code. Sec. 503.49. If a board of township trustees has adopted a resolution under section 503.41 of the Revised Code, the board shall deposit the fees collected by the township for massage establishment permits and masseur and masseuse massager licenses in the township general fund and first use the fees for the cost of administering and enforcing regulations adopted under section 503.41 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2927.17. (A) No person, by means of a statement, solicitation, or offer in a print or electronic publication, sign, placard, storefront display, or other medium, shall advertise massage therapy, relaxation massage, any other massage technique or method, or any related service, with the suggestion or promise of sexual activity. (B) No person, by means of a statement, solicitation, or offer in a print or electronic publication, sign, placard, storefront display, or other medium, shall advertise massage therapy, relaxation massage, any other massage technique or method, or any related service unless the service is to be performed by a person who is licensed by the state medical board as a massage therapist in accordance with Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code or who meets the conditions specified in division (F) of section 4731.15 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of unlawful advertising of a sexual massage, a misdemeanor of the first degree. (C)(2) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of advertising an unlicensed massage, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the third degree on each subsequent offense. (D) Nothing in this section prevents the legislative authority of a municipal corporation or township from enacting any regulation of the advertising of massage further than and in addition to the provisions of divisions (A) and, (B), and (C) of this section. (D)(E) As used in this section, "sexual: (1) "Massage therapy" has the same meaning as in section 4731.04 of the Revised Code. (2) "Sexual activity" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4731.04. As used in this chapter: (A) "Fifth pathway training" means supervised clinical training obtained in the United States as a substitute for the internship or social service requirements of a foreign medical school. (B) "Graduate medical education" means education received through any of the following: (1) An internship, residency, or clinical fellowship program conducted in the United States and accredited by either the accreditation council for graduate medical education of the American medical association or the American osteopathic association; (2) A clinical fellowship program that is not accredited as described in division (B)(1) of this section, but is conducted in the United States at an institution with a residency program that is accredited as described in that division and is in a clinical field the same as or related to the clinical field of the fellowship program; (3) An internship program conducted in Canada and accredited by the committee on accreditation of preregistration physician training programs of the federation of provincial medical licensing authorities of Canada; (4) A residency program conducted in Canada and accredited by either the royal college of physicians and surgeons of Canada or the college of family physicians of Canada. (C) "Massage therapy" means the treatment of disorders of the human body by the manipulation of soft tissue through the systematic external application of massage techniques including touch, exerting pressure on, stimulating with the hands, stroking, friction, vibration, percussion, kneading, stretching, compression, and rubbing, tapping, pounding, and joint movements within the normal physiologic range of motion; and adjunctive thereto, the external application of water, heat, cold, topical preparations, and mechanical devices, and electrical apparatuses or appliances. Sec. 4731.15. (A) The state medical board also shall regulate the following limited branches of medicine: massage therapy, and to the extent specified in section 4731.151 of the Revised Code, naprapathy and mechanotherapy. The board shall adopt rules governing the limited branches of medicine under its jurisdiction. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (B) A license to practice a limited branch of medicine issued by the state medical board is valid for a two-year period unless revoked or suspended and expires on the date that is two years after the date of issuance. The license may be renewed for additional two-year periods in accordance with division (C) of this section. (C) Both of the following apply with respect to the renewal of licenses to practice a limited branch of medicine: (1) Each person seeking to renew a license to practice a limited branch of medicine shall apply for biennial renewal with the state medical board in a manner prescribed by the board. An applicant for renewal shall pay a biennial renewal fee of one hundred dollars. (2) At least one month before a license expires, the board shall provide a renewal notice to the license holder. (D) All persons who hold a license to practice a limited branch of medicine issued by the state medical board shall provide the board notice of any change of address. The notice shall be submitted to the board not later than thirty days after the change of address. (E) A license to practice a limited branch of medicine shall be automatically suspended if the license holder fails to renew the license in accordance with division (C) of this section. Continued practice after the suspension of the license to practice shall be considered as practicing in violation of sections 4731.34 and 4731.41 of the Revised Code. If a license has been suspended pursuant to this division for two years or less, it may be reinstated. The board shall reinstate the license upon an applicant's submission of a renewal application and payment of a reinstatement fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars. If a license has been suspended pursuant to this division for more than two years, it may be restored. Subject to section 4731.222 of the Revised Code, the board may restore the license upon an applicant's submission of a restoration application and a restoration fee of one hundred fifty dollars and compliance with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code. The board shall not restore to an applicant a license to practice unless the board, in its discretion, decides that the results of the criminal records check do not make the applicant ineligible for a license issued pursuant to section 4731.17 of the Revised Code. (F) The following persons are not required to hold a license to practice massage therapy issued under this chapter: (1) A person authorized to practice under Chapter 4709., 4713., 4723., 4730., 4734., 4755., or 4762. of the Revised Code, provided that the scope of practice authorizes the person to use massage techniques and the massage techniques are performed by the person in the course of and at the location of the person's practice of the authorized profession; (2) An enrolled student practicing massage therapy as part of a program of study at a school, college, or institution in good standing as determined by the board in accordance with division (A) of section 4731.16 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4731.41. (A) No Except as provided in division (F) of section 4731.15 of the Revised Code, no person shall practice medicine and surgery, or any of its branches, without the appropriate license or certificate from the state medical board to engage in the practice. No person shall advertise or claim to the public to be a practitioner of medicine and surgery, or any of its branches, without a license or certificate from the board. No person shall open or conduct an office or other place for such practice without a license or certificate from the board. No person shall conduct an office in the name of some person who has a license or certificate to practice medicine and surgery, or any of its branches. No person shall practice medicine and surgery, or any of its branches, after the person's license or certificate has been revoked, or, if suspended, during the time of such suspension. A license or certificate signed by the secretary of the board to which is affixed the official seal of the board to the effect that it appears from the records of the board that no such license or certificate to practice medicine and surgery, or any of its branches, in this state has been issued to the person specified therein, or that a license or certificate to practice, if issued, has been revoked or suspended, shall be received as prima-facie evidence of the record of the board in any court or before any officer of the state. (B) No license or certificate from the state medical board is required by a physician who comes into this state to practice medicine at a free-of-charge camp accredited by the SeriousFun children's network that specializes in providing therapeutic recreation, as defined in section 2305.231 of the Revised Code, for individuals with chronic illnesses as long as all of the following apply: (1) The physician provides documentation to the medical director of the camp that the physician is licensed and in good standing to practice medicine in another state; (2) The physician provides services only at the camp or in connection with camp events or camp activities that occur off the grounds of the camp; (3) The physician receives no compensation for the services; (4) The physician provides those services within this state for not more than thirty days per calendar year; (5) The camp has a medical director who holds an unrestricted license to practice medicine issued in accordance with division (A) of this section. (C) Division (A) of this section does not apply to a person who meets both of the following conditions: (1) The person holds in good standing a valid license to practice medicine and surgery issued by another state. (2) The person is practicing as a volunteer without remuneration during a charitable event that lasts not more than seven days. When a person meets the conditions of this division, the person shall be deemed authorized by the state medical board, during the course of the charitable event, to practice medicine and surgery and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter authorizing the board to take disciplinary action against a physician. Not less than seven calendar days before the first day of the charitable event, the person or the event's organizer shall notify the board of the person's intent to practice medicine and surgery at the event. During the course of the charitable event, the person's scope of practice is limited to the procedures that a physician authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery is authorized to perform unless the person's scope of practice in the other state is more restrictive than in this state. If the latter is the case, the person's scope of practice is limited to the procedures that a physician in the other state may perform. Sec. 4731.99. (A) Whoever violates section 4731.41, of the Revised Code, if the violation does not pertain to the practice of massage therapy, is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. (B) Whoever violates section 4731.41 of the Revised Code, if the violation pertains to the practice of massage therapy, is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. (C) Whoever violates section 4731.43, or 4731.60 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. (B)(D) Whoever violates section 4731.49, 4731.50, or 4731.81 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the first degree on each subsequent offense. (C)(E) Whoever violates section 4731.46 or 4731.47 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree. (D)(F) Whoever violates section 4731.48 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (E)(1)(G)(1) Whoever violates division (B)(1), (C)(1), (C)(2), (D), or (E) of section 4731.224 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense, except that an individual guilty of a subsequent offense shall not be subject to imprisonment, but to a fine alone of up to one thousand dollars for each offense. (2) Whoever violates division (B)(2) or (C)(3) of section 4731.224 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the first degree on each subsequent offense. (F)(H) Whoever violates section 4731.481 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (G)(I) Whoever violates division (F)(5) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. Section 2. That existing sections 503.40, 503.41, 503.42, 503.44, 503.45, 503.46, 503.47, 503.48, 503.49, 2927.17, 4731.04, 4731.15, 4731.41, and 4731.99 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.